North Carolina statutes. Chapter 160A. Cities and Towns.
Article 4A. Extension of Corporate Limits.
§ 160A-58.50.
Declaration of policy.

It is hereby declared as a matter of State policy:

That sound urban development is essential to the continued economic development of North Carolina.

That municipalities are created to provide the governmental services essential for sound urban development and for the protection of health, safety, and welfare in areas being intensively used for residential, commercial, industrial, institutional, and governmental purposes or in areas undergoing such development.

That municipal boundaries should be extended in accordance with legislative standards applicable throughout the State to include such areas and to provide the high quality of governmental services needed therein for the public health, safety, and welfare.

That areas annexed to municipalities in accordance with such uniform legislative standards should receive the services provided by the annexing municipality.

That the provision of services to protect the health, safety, and welfare is a public purpose.

That it is essential for citizens to have an effective voice in annexations initiated by municipalities.

History.

2011-396, s. 9.

Twelve-year Prohibition on Involuntary Annexation.

Session Laws 2012-3, s. 3, effective July 1, 2012, provides: “Twelve-year prohibition on involuntary annexation. — All areas affected by the annexation ordinances described in Section 4 of this act shall not be subject to any annexation proceeding, other than a voluntary annexation under Part 1 or Part 4 of Article 4A of Chapter 160A of the General Statutes, or local act of the General Assembly, for a period of 12 years from and after the effective date of this act. After the 12-year period, the area may be subject to annexation in accordance with State law effective at that time.”

Session Laws 2012-3, s. 4, provides: “Repealed involuntary annexation ordinances.

“(1) Kinston annexation ordinance, as described in House Bill 5, First Edition, 2011 Regular Session.

“(2) Lexington annexation ordinance, as described in House Bill 37, First Edition, 2011 Regular Session.

“(3) Rocky Mount annexation ordinance, as described in House Bill 56, First Edition, 2011 Regular Session.

“(4) Wilmington annexation ordinance, described in House Bill 180, First Edition, 2011 Regular Session.

“(5) Asheville/Biltmore Lake annexation ordinance, as described in House Bill 236, First Edition, 2011 Regular Session.

“(6) Marvin annexation ordinance, affecting the area described in RS 2008-02-02, a resolution of the Village of Marvin Council.

“(7) Southport annexation ordinance, affecting ‘Area A’ and ‘Area B,’ as described in City of Southport annexation ordinance, adopted June 9, 2011.

“(8) Goldsboro annexation ordinance, affecting the area described in Senate Bill 314, First Edition, 2011 Regular Session.

“(9) Fayetteville Gates Four annexation ordinance, as described in House Bill 231, First Edition, 2011 Regular Session.”

Session Laws 2012-3, s. 6, is a severability clause.

Session Laws 2012-103, s. 2, effective June 29, 2012, provides: “Twelve-year prohibition on involuntary annexation. — All areas affected by the annexation ordinances described in Section 3 of this act shall not be subject to any annexation proceeding, other than a voluntary annexation under Part 1 or Part 4 of Article 4A of Chapter 160A of the General Statutes, or local act of the General Assembly, for a period of 12 years from and after the effective date of this act. After the 12-year period, the area may be subject to annexation in accordance with State law effective at that time.”

Session Laws 2012-103, s. 3, provides: “Repealed involuntary annexation ordinances. —

“(1) Elizabethtown Annexation Ordinance 2011-04 (Area A) adopted June 6, 2011.

“(2) Elizabethtown Annexation Ordinance 2011-05 (Area B) adopted June 6, 2011.

“(3) Elizabethtown Annexation Ordinance 2011-06 (Area C) adopted June 6, 2011.

“(4) Elizabethtown Annexation Ordinance 2011-07 (Area D) adopted June 6, 2011.”

Session Laws 2012-103, s. 4, is a severability clause.

Session Laws 2012-104, s. 2, effective June 29, 2012, provides: “Twelve-year prohibition on involuntary annexation. — All areas affected by the annexation ordinances described in Section 3 of this act shall not be subject to any annexation proceeding, other than a voluntary annexation under Part 1 or Part 4 of Article 4A of Chapter 160A of the General Statutes, or local act of the General Assembly, for a period of 12 years from and after the effective date of this act. After the 12-year period, the area may be subject to annexation in accordance with State law effective at that time.”

Session Laws 2012-104, s. 3, provides: “Repealed involuntary annexation ordinances. —

“(1) Elizabethtown Annexation Ordinance 2011-09 (Area J) adopted June 6, 2011.

“(2) Elizabethtown Annexation Ordinance 2011-10 (Area N) adopted June 6, 2011.

“(3) Elizabethtown Annexation Ordinance 2011-07 (Area Q) adopted June 6, 2011.”

Session Laws 2012-104, s. 4, is a severability clause.

§ 160A-58.51.
Definitions.

As used in this Part, the following definitions apply:

Contiguous area. — Any area which, at the time annexation procedures are initiated, either abuts directly on the municipal boundary or is separated from the municipal boundary by a street or street right-of-way, a creek or river, the right-of-way of a railroad or other public service corporation, lands owned by the municipality or some other political subdivision, or lands owned by the State of North Carolina. A connecting corridor consisting solely of the length of a street or street right-of-way may not be used to establish contiguity.

Eligible property owner. — A property owner who is eligible to be notified of the opportunity to have water lines and sewer lines and connections installed at no cost to the property owner. A property owner is eligible to be notified of the opportunity to have water lines and sewer lines and connections installed at no cost to the property owner if that property owner held a freehold interest in the real property to be annexed as of the date of the combined notice of public informational meeting and public hearing.

Necessary land connection. — An area that does not exceed twenty-five percent (25%) of the total area to be annexed.

Property owner. — Any person having a freehold interest in real property.

Used for residential purposes. — Any lot or tract five acres or less in size on which is constructed a habitable dwelling unit. The term also includes any lot or tract that is used in common for social or recreational purposes by either owners of lots with habitable dwelling units or owners of lots intended for occupation by dwelling units and the lot owners have a real property interest in the commonly used property that attaches to or is appurtenant to the owners’ lots.

History.

2011-396, s. 9; 2012-11, s. 4.

§ 160A-58.52.
Authority to annex.

The governing board of any municipality may extend the corporate limits of such municipality under the procedure set forth in this Part.

History.

2011-396, s. 9.

§ 160A-58.53.
Prerequisites to annexation.

A municipality exercising authority under this Part shall make plans for the extension of services to the area proposed to be annexed and shall, prior to the public hearing provided for in

G.S. 160A-58.55

, prepare a report setting forth such plans to provide services to the area proposed to be annexed. The report shall include the following:

A map or maps of the municipality and adjacent territory to show the following information:

The present and proposed boundaries of the municipality.

The present major trunk water mains and sewer interceptors and outfalls, and the proposed extensions of such mains, outfalls, and lines as required in subdivision (3) of this section. The water and sewer map shall bear the seal of a registered professional engineer.

The general land use pattern in the area proposed to be annexed.

A statement showing that the area proposed to be annexed meets the requirements of

G.S. 160A-58.54

.

A statement setting forth the plans for extending to the area proposed to be annexed each major municipal service on substantially the same basis and in the same manner as such services are provided within the rest of the municipality prior to annexation and the method to finance the extension of major municipal services into the area proposed to be annexed as follows:

Provision of police protection, fire protection, solid waste collection, and street maintenance services on the effective date of annexation. A contract with a rural fire department to provide fire protection shall be an acceptable method of providing fire protection. A contract with a private firm to provide solid waste collection services shall be an acceptable method of providing solid waste collection services.

Extension of water and sewer services to each lot or parcel, if an installation easement is provided by the affected property owner, with a proposed timetable for construction of such mains, outfalls, and lines within three and one-half years of the effective date of annexation, in accordance with

G.S. 160A-58.56

.

A statement of the impact of the annexation on any rural fire department providing service in the area proposed to be annexed and a statement of the impact of the annexation on fire protection and fire insurance rates in the area proposed to be annexed, if the area where service is provided is in an insurance district designated under

G.S. 153A-233

, a rural fire protection district under Article 3A of Chapter 69 of the General Statutes, or a fire service district under Article 16 of Chapter 153A of the General Statutes. The rural fire department shall make available to the municipality not later than 30 days following a written request from the municipality all information in its possession or control, including operational, financial, and budgetary information, necessary for preparation of a statement of impact. The municipality shall, in a timely fashion, supply the rural fire department with information requested by the rural fire department to respond to the written request. The rural fire department forfeits its rights under

G.S. 160A-58.57

if it fails to make a good faith response within 45 days following receipt of the written request for information from the municipality, provided that the municipality’s written request so states by specific reference to this subdivision.

A statement showing how the proposed annexation will affect the municipality’s finances and services, including municipal revenue change estimates. This statement shall be delivered to the clerk of the board of county commissioners at least 30 days before the date of the public informational meeting on any annexation under this Part.

History.

2011-396, s. 9.

§ 160A-58.54.
Character of area to be annexed.

A municipal governing board may extend the municipal corporate limits to include any area that meets all of the following criteria:

It shall be adjacent or contiguous to the municipality’s boundaries at the time the annexation proceeding is begun, except if the entire territory of a county water and sewer district created under G.S. 162A-86(b1) is being annexed, the annexation shall also include any noncontiguous pieces of the district as long as the part of the district with the greatest land area is adjacent or contiguous to the municipality’s boundaries at the time the annexation proceeding is begun.

At least one-eighth of the aggregate external boundaries of the area shall coincide with the municipal boundary.

No part of the area shall be included within the boundary of another incorporated municipality.

The total area to be annexed shall meet the requirements of any of the following:

Part or all of the area to be annexed must be developed for urban purposes at the time of approval of the report provided for in

G.S. 160A-58.53

. The area of streets and street rights-of-way shall not be used to determine total acreage under this subdivision. An area developed for urban purposes is defined as any area which meets any one of the following standards:

Has a total resident population equal to at least two and three-tenths persons for each acre of land included within its boundaries.

Has a total resident population equal to at least one person for each acre of land included within its boundaries, and is subdivided into lots and tracts such that at least sixty percent (60%) of the total acreage consists of lots and tracts three acres or less in size and such that at least sixty-five percent (65%) of the total number of lots and tracts are one acre or less in size.

Is so developed that at least sixty percent (60%) of the total number of lots and tracts in the area at the time of annexation are used for residential, commercial, industrial, institutional, or governmental purposes, and is subdivided into lots and tracts such that at least sixty percent (60%) of the total acreage, not counting the acreage used at the time of annexation for commercial, industrial, governmental, or institutional purposes, consists of lots and tracts three acres or less in size.

Is the entire area of any county water and sewer district created under G.S. 162A-86(b1), if all of the following apply:

The municipality has provided in a contract with that district that the area is developed for urban purposes.

The contract provides for the municipality to operate the sewer system of that county water and sewer district.

The municipality is annexing in one ordinance the entire territory of the district not already within the corporate limits of a municipality.

Is so developed that, at the time of the approval of the annexation report, all tracts in the area to be annexed are used for commercial, industrial, governmental, or institutional purposes.

Part or all of the area to be annexed meets either of the following:

Lies between the municipal boundary and an area developed for urban purposes so that the area developed for urban purposes is either not adjacent to the municipal boundary or cannot be served by the municipality without extending major municipal services, including water or sewer lines, through such sparsely developed area.

Is adjacent, on at least sixty percent (60%) of its external boundary, to any combination of the municipal boundary and the boundary of an area or areas developed for urban purposes as defined in sub-subdivision a. of this subsection.

The purpose of paragraphs 1. and 2. of this sub-subdivision is to permit municipal governing boards to extend corporate limits to include all nearby areas developed for urban purposes and where necessary to include areas which at the time of annexation are not yet developed for urban purposes but which constitute necessary land connections between the municipality and areas developed for urban purposes or between two or more areas developed for urban purposes.

The total area to be annexed is completely surrounded by the municipality’s primary corporate limits.

In fixing new municipal boundaries and determining whether an area is developed for urban purposes, a municipal governing board shall comply with all the following:

Use recorded property lines and streets as boundaries. Some or all of the boundaries of a county water and sewer district may also be used when the entire district is not already within the corporate limits of the municipality.

Use whole parcels of property in that if any portion of that parcel is included, the entire parcel of real property as recorded in the deed transferring title shall be included.

Not use a connecting corridor consisting solely of the length of a street or street right-of-way to establish contiguity.

Not consider property in use for a commercial, industrial, institutional, or governmental purpose if the lot or tract is used only temporarily, occasionally, or on an incidental or insubstantial basis in relation to the size and character of the lot or tract.

Include acreage actually occupied by buildings or other man-made structures together with all areas that are reasonably necessary and appurtenant to such facilities for purposes of parking, storage, ingress and egress, utilities, buffering, and other ancillary services and facilities when determining acreage in use for commercial, industrial, institutional, or governmental purposes.

Consider the area of an abolished water and sewer district to be a water and sewer district for the purpose of this section even after its abolition under G.S. 162A-87.2(b).

As used in this subsection, “bona fide farm purposes” is as described in G.S. 153A-340. As used in this subsection, “property” means a single tract of property or an identifiable portion of a single tract. Property that is being used for bona fide farm purposes on the date of the resolution of intent to consider annexation may not be annexed without the written consent of the owner or owners of the property.

History.

2011-396, s. 9; 2011-363, s. 3.1.

§ 160A-58.55.
Procedure for annexation.

Resolution of Consideration. — Any municipal governing board desiring to annex territory under the provisions of this Part shall first pass a resolution of consideration identifying the area under consideration for annexation by either a metes and bounds description or a map. The resolution of consideration shall remain effective for two years after adoption and be filed with the municipal clerk. A new resolution of consideration adopted before expiration of the two-year period for a previously adopted resolution covering the same area shall relate back to the date of the previous resolution. Adoption of a resolution of consideration shall not confer prior jurisdiction over the area as to any other municipality.

Notice of Resolution of Consideration. — A notice of the adoption of the resolution of consideration shall be published once a week for two successive weeks, with each publication being on the same day of the week, in a newspaper having general circulation in the municipality. The second publication shall be no more than 30 days following adoption of the resolution of consideration. The resolution of consideration shall contain a map or description of the area under consideration and a summary of the annexation process and time lines. A copy of the resolution of consideration shall be mailed within 30 days after the adoption of the resolution of consideration by first class mail to the property owners of real property located within the area under consideration for annexation as shown by the tax records of the county. If a proposed annexation extends across a county border into a county other that the county where the majority of the area of the existing municipality is located, a copy of the resolution of consideration shall be mailed within 30 days after the adoption of the resolution of consideration by first class mail to the clerk of the board of county commissioners of that county.

Resolution of Intent. — At least one year after adoption of the resolution of consideration, the municipal governing body may adopt a resolution of intent of the municipality to proceed with the annexation of some or all of the area described in the resolution of consideration. The resolution of intent shall describe the boundaries of the area proposed for annexation, fix a date for a public informational meeting, fix a date for a public hearing on the question of annexation, and fix a date for the referendum on annexation. The date for the public informational meeting shall be not less than 45 days and not more than 55 days following passage of the resolution of intent. The date for the public hearing shall be not less than 130 days and not more than 150 days following passage of the resolution of intent. The date of the referendum on annexation shall be set for the next municipal general election that is more than 45 days from the date of the resolution of intent.

Notice of Public Informational Meeting, Public Hearing, and Opportunity for Water and Sewer. — A combined notice of public informational meeting and public hearing shall be issued as provided for in this subsection as follows:

The notice shall be a combined notice that includes at least all of the following:

The date, hour, and place of the public informational meeting.

The date, hour, and place of the public hearing.

A clear description of the boundaries of the area under consideration, including a legible map of the area.

A statement that the report required by

G.S. 160A-58.53

will be available at the office of the municipal clerk.

An explanation of a property owner’s rights under this section.

A summary of the annexation process with time lines.

A summary of the opportunity to vote in the referendum and available statutory remedies appealing the annexation and the failure to provide services.

Information on how to request to become a customer of the water and sewer service, all forms to request that service, and the consequences of opting in or opting out, as provided in

G.S. 160A-58.56

.

A clear description of the distinction between the public informational meeting and the public hearing.

The combined notice shall be given by publication of the information required by sub-subdivisions (1)a., b., and c. of this subsection and a statement regarding the availability of the information required by the remaining sub-subdivisions of subdivision (1) of this subsection in a newspaper having general circulation in the municipality once a week for at least two successive weeks prior to the date of the public informational meeting, with each publication being on the same day of the week. The date of the last publication shall be not more than 10 days preceding the date of the public informational meeting. In addition thereto, if the area proposed to be annexed lies in a county containing less than fifty percent (50%) of the land area of the municipality, the same publication shall be given in a newspaper having general circulation in the area of proposed annexation. If there is no such newspaper, the municipality shall post the notice in at least five public places within the municipality and at least five public places in the area to be annexed for 30 days prior to the date of public informational meeting.

The combined notice, together with the information about requesting water and sewer service, shall be mailed within five business days of the passage of the resolution of intent by first class mail to the property owners of real property located within the area to be annexed as shown by the tax records of the county. The person or persons mailing such notices shall certify to the governing board that fact, and such certificate shall become a part of the public record of the annexation proceeding and shall be deemed conclusive in the absence of fraud. If a notice is returned to the municipality by the postal service by the tenth day before the informational meeting, a copy of the notice shall be sent by certified mail, return receipt requested, at least seven days before the informational meeting. Failure to comply with the mailing requirement of this subsection shall not invalidate the annexation unless it is shown that the requirements were not substantially complied with.

If the governing board by resolution finds that the tax records are not adequate to identify the property owners within the area to be annexed after exercising reasonable efforts to locate the property owners, it may, in lieu of the mail procedure required by subdivision (3) of this subsection, post the notice at least 30 days prior to the date of the public informational meeting on all buildings, on such parcels, and in at least five other places within the area to be annexed as to those parcels where the property owner could not be so identified. In any case where notices are placed on property, the person placing the notice shall certify that fact to the governing board.

Action Prior to Informational Meeting. — At least 30 days before the date of the public informational meeting, the municipal governing board shall do all of the following:

Approve the report provided for in

G.S. 160A-58.53

.

Prepare a summary of the approved report for public distribution.

Post in the office of the clerk all of the following:

The approved report provided for in

G.S. 160A-58.53

.

The summary of the approved report.

A legible map of the area to be annexed.

The list of the property owners, and associated mailing addresses, in the area to be annexed that the municipality has identified and mailed notice.

Information for property owners on how to request to become a customer of the water service or sewer service and all forms to request that service.

If the municipality has a Web site, post on that Web site all of the information under this section together with any forms to apply for water and sewer service.

Prepare a summary of the opportunity to vote in the referendum and available statutory remedies for appealing the annexation for public distribution.

Public Informational Meeting. — At the public informational meeting, a representative of the municipality shall first make an explanation of the report required in

G.S. 160A-58.53

and an explanation of the provision of major municipal services. The explanation of the provision of services shall include how to request water service or sewer service to individual lots, the average cost of a residential connection to the water and sewer system, and the opportunity for installation of a residential connection under

G.S. 160A-58.56

. A summary of the annexation process with time lines, a summary of opportunity to vote in the referendum and available statutory remedies for appealing the annexation, an explanation of the provision of services, and information for requesting water service or sewer service to individual lots and any forms to so request shall also be distributed at the public informational meeting. Following such explanation, all property owners and residents of the area proposed to be annexed as described in the notice of public informational meeting and hearing, and all residents of the municipality shall be given the opportunity to ask questions and receive answers regarding the proposed annexation.

Public Hearing. — At the public hearing, a representative of the municipality shall first make an explanation of the report required in

G.S. 160A-58.53

. Following such explanation, all property owners and residents of the area proposed to be annexed as described in the notice of public informational meeting and hearing, and all residents of the municipality, shall be given an opportunity to be heard.

The municipal governing board shall take into consideration facts presented at the public hearing and shall have authority to amend the report required by

G.S. 160A-58.53

to make changes in the plans for serving the area proposed to be annexed so long as such changes meet the requirements of

G.S. 160A-58.53

. At any regular or special meeting held no sooner than the tenth day following the certification of the election held under

G.S. 160A-58.64

, the governing board shall have authority to adopt an ordinance, subject to subsection (i) of this section, extending the corporate limits of the municipality to include all, or part, of the area described in the notice of public hearing which the governing board has concluded should be annexed. The annexation ordinance shall:

Contain specific findings showing that the area to be annexed meets the requirements of

G.S. 160A-58.54

.

Describe the external boundaries of the area to be annexed by metes and bounds.

Include a statement of the intent of the municipality to provide services to the area being annexed as set forth in the report required by G.S. 160A-58.53 and a time line for the provision of those services.

Contain a specific finding that on the effective date of annexation, the municipality will have funds appropriated in sufficient amount to finance construction of any water and sewer lines stated in the report required by G.S. 160A-58.53 to extend the water and sewer services into the area to be annexed, or that on the effective date of annexation the municipality will have authority to issue bonds in an amount sufficient to finance such construction. If authority to issue such bonds shall be secured from the electorate of the municipality prior to the effective date of annexation, then the effective date of annexation shall be no earlier than the day following the statement of the successful result of the bond election.

Fix the effective date for annexation as June 30 next following the adoption of the ordinance or the second June 30 following adoption of the ordinance, but not before the completion of the water and sewer request appeal periods are complete.

Together, with the list of the property owners of parcels within the area described in the annexation ordinance to which a notice was mailed under subsection (d) of this section, be delivered within five business days to the tax assessor and the board of elections of the county in which a majority of the municipality lies.

Repealed by Session Laws 2012-11, s. 2, effective July 1, 2012.

If a public body has a Web site, conspicuously post notice of the referendum until after the certification of the election.

Referendum Vote on Annexation Ordinance. — The procedures in

G.S. 160A-58.64

shall apply to any annexation under this Part. The municipality shall reimburse the board or boards of elections the costs of the referendum required under

G.S. 160A-58.64

.

Effect of Annexation Ordinance. — From and after the effective date of the annexation ordinance, the territory and its citizens and property shall be subject to all debts, laws, ordinances, and regulations in force in such municipality and shall be entitled to the same privileges and benefits as other parts of such municipality.

Reserved.

Reserved.

Simultaneous Annexation Proceedings. — If a municipality is considering the annexation of two or more areas which are all adjacent to the municipal boundary but are not adjacent to one another, it may undertake simultaneous proceedings under authority of this Part for the annexation of such areas.

Remedies for Failure to Provide Services. — If, not earlier than 30 days after the effective date of annexation and not later than 15 months from the effective date of annexation, any property owner in the annexed territory shall believe that the municipality has not followed through providing services as set forth in the report adopted under

G.S. 160A-58.53

and subsection (e) of this section, the property owner may apply for a writ of mandamus. Relief may be granted by the judge of superior court if the municipality has not provided the services set forth in its plan submitted under the provisions of

G.S. 160A-58.53

(3)a. on substantially the same basis and in the same manner as such services were provided within the rest of the municipality prior to the effective date of annexation and those services are still being provided on substantially the same basis and in the same manner within the original corporate limits of the municipality. If a writ is issued, costs in the action, including reasonable attorneys’ fees for such aggrieved property owner, shall be charged to the municipality.

Reports to the Local Government Commission. — The municipality shall report to the Local Government Commission as follows:

As to whether police protection, fire protection, solid waste services, and street maintenance services were provided in accordance with

G.S. 160A-58.53(3)

a., within 30 days after the effective date of the annexation. Such report shall be filed no more than 30 days following the expiration of the 30-day period. If the Local Government Commission determines that the municipality failed to deliver police protection, fire protection, solid waste services, or street maintenance services as provided for in

G.S. 160A-58.53(3)

a. within 30 days after the effective date of the annexation, the Local Government Commission shall notify the municipality that the municipality may not count any of the residents as part of the population of the municipality for the purpose of receiving any State, federal, or county dollars distributed based on population until all of the services are provided.

As to whether the extension of water and sewer lines was completed within the time period specified in G.S. 160A-58.53(3), within six months after the effective date of the annexation ordinance, and again within three and one-half years of the effective date of the annexation ordinance or upon the completion of the installation, whichever occurs first. If the municipality failed to deliver either water or sewer services, or both, as provided for in G.S. 160A-58.53(3)b. within three and one-half years after the effective date of the annexation, the municipality shall stop any other annexations in progress and may not begin any other annexation until the water and sewer services are provided. The municipality shall adopt a resolution of consideration to begin again any annexation that is stopped due to this subdivision.

History.

2011-396, s. 9; 2012-11, s. 2.